North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 3. National Guard.
§ 127A-49.
Special courts-martial; appointments, power and authority.

In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, special courts-martial may be appointed by any of the following:

The commander of a brigade, regiment, comparable or higher command of the North Carolina Army National Guard, provided that the commander is a general officer.

The commander of a wing, group, separate squadron, comparable or higher command of the North Carolina Air National Guard, provided that the commander is a general officer.

The commander or officer in charge of any North Carolina National Guard command when empowered by the Governor or the Adjutant General of North Carolina, provided that the commander or officer is a general officer.

Except as to commissioned officers, special courts-martial shall have the power and authority to try any person subject to military law for any crimes or offenses within the jurisdiction of a general military court. Special courts-martial shall have the power to impose punishments in like manner and to the extent prescribed by the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be in use by the Armed Forces of the United States at the time of the offense, except that (i) no court shall have the authority to impose confinement as part of the sentence unless the court consisted of a military judge and not less than three members except that a defendant who requests a military judge alone may be sentenced to confinement, and (ii) no court shall have the authority to impose confinement in excess of six months as part of a sentence.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 57; C.S., s. 6827; 1957, c. 136, s. 8; 1963, c. 1018, s. 3; 1973, c. 1123; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 3; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-50.
Summary courts-martial.

In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, summary courts-martial may be appointed by any of the following:

Any person who may convene a general or special court-martial.

The commander of a battalion, comparable or higher command of the North Carolina Army National Guard, provided that the commander is an officer of the grade of major or above.

The commander of a detached squadron, comparable or higher command of the North Carolina Air National Guard, provided that the commander is an officer of the grade of major or above.

The court shall consist of one officer who shall have the power to administer oaths and try enlisted personnel of each respective command for breaches of discipline and violations of laws governing those organizations. These courts shall also have the power to impose punishments in like manner and to the extent prescribed by the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be in use by the Armed Forces of the United States at the time of the offense, except that no court shall have the authority to impose confinement as part of a sentence. There shall be no right to demand trial by court-martial.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 58; C.S., s. 6828; 1957, c. 136, s. 9; 1963, c. 1018, s. 4; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 315, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 4; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-50.1.
Military judges.

The Adjutant General shall appoint military judges to preside over courts-martial of the North Carolina National Guard not in federal service. Minimum requirements for appointment as a military judge are:

Certification as a military judge by the Judge Advocate General of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marines, or Coast Guard.

Designation as a judge advocate by the Judge Advocate General of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, or Coast Guard.

Membership in the North Carolina National Guard, the National Guard of another state, or the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

1987, c. 649, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 5; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-51.
Nonjudicial punishment.

Any commander of the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, may, in addition to or in lieu of admonition or reprimand, impose nonjudicial punishment in like manner and to the extent prescribed by Article 15 of the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be currently in use by the Armed Forces of the United States except that there shall be no right to demand trial by court-martial.

History.

1957, c. 136, s. 10; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 315, s. 2; c. 316, s. 1; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 6; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-52.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial.

The jurisdiction of courts-martial of the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, shall be as prescribed by the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be currently in use by the Armed Forces of the United States. Such courts-martial shall have jurisdiction to try accused persons for offenses committed while serving without the State and while going to and returning from service without the State in like manner and to the same extent as while serving within the State.

History.

1957, c. 136, s. 10; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 316, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 7; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-53.
Manual for Courts-Martial.

Trials and proceedings by all courts and boards shall be in accordance with the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be currently in use by the Armed Forces of the United States, except as modified by this Chapter.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 64; C.S., s. 6831; 1957, c. 136, s. 14; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 316, s. 3; 2010-193, s. 8; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-54.
Pretrial confinement; sentences; where executed. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A defendant may be arrested and placed under pretrial confinement in a local government confinement facility, but a determination shall be made under subsection (b) of this section whether he or she shall remain confined pending the court-martial. If the defendant is not released from confinement, he or she shall be transferred into the custody of the Sheriff of Wake County and confined in the Wake County confinement facility pending trial. All costs of transportation and confinement are to be paid from funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety as reimbursements to the local government or agency providing the transportation and confinement.

The provisions of Article 26 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes shall apply to any defendant who has been placed into pretrial confinement, in the same manner as if the defendant had been placed into confinement for an alleged violation of the criminal laws of this State. Nothing in this section is intended to abridge the right of habeas corpus.

Any defendant whose sentence by a military court includes confinement shall be placed into the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety is authorized to transfer physical custody of the defendant to a local confinement facility.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 61; C.S., s. 6832; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2010-193, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h); 2017-186, s. 2(uuuuu).

§ 127A-54.
Pretrial confinement; sentences; where executed. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A defendant may be arrested and placed under pretrial confinement in a local government confinement facility, but a determination shall be made under subsection (b) of this section whether he or she shall remain confined pending the court-martial. If the defendant is not released from confinement, he or she shall be transferred into the custody of the Sheriff of Wake County and confined in the Wake County confinement facility pending trial. All costs of transportation and confinement are to be paid from funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety as reimbursements to the local government or agency providing the transportation and confinement.

The provisions of Article 26 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes shall apply to any defendant who has been placed into pretrial confinement, in the same manner as if the defendant had been placed into confinement for an alleged violation of the criminal laws of this State. Nothing in this section is intended to abridge the right of habeas corpus.

Any defendant whose sentence by a military court includes confinement shall be placed into the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized to transfer physical custody of the defendant to a local confinement facility.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 61; C.S., s. 6832; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2010-193, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h); 2017-186, s. 2(uuuuu); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(rrr).

§ 127A-55.
Forms for courts-martial procedure.

In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, forms for courts-martial procedure shall be substantially as those set forth in the Appendices, Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as shall be currently in use by the Armed Forces of the United States, with any modifications required by this Chapter.

History.

1957, c. 136, s. 13; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 316, s. 4; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 10; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-56.
Powers of courts-martial.

In the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, presidents of courts-martial and summary court officers shall have power to issue warrants to arrest an accused person and to bring the person before a court for trial whenever the person has disobeyed an order in writing from the convening authority to appear before the court, a copy of the charge or charges having been delivered to the accused with the order, and to issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, and to enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records and other articles subject to a subpoena duces tecum, and to sentence for a refusal to be sworn or to answer as provided in actions before civil courts. The presiding officer shall also have power to punish for contempt occurring in the presence of the court.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 60; C.S., s. 6830; 1957, c. 136, s. 12; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 1983, c. 316, s. 5; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 11; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-57.
Execution of processes and sentences.

All warrants and other processes authorized by this Chapter and sentences of any of the military courts of this State shall be executed by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or State or local law enforcement officer into whose hands they may be placed for service or execution, and the officer shall make return thereof to the officer issuing or imposing the same. The service or execution of process or sentence shall be made by the officer without tender or advancement of fee therefor; but all costs in these cases shall be paid from funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 62; C.S., s. 6833; 1973, c. 108, s. 80; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2010-193, s. 12; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-193, s. 13, effective December 1, 2010.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 59; C.S., s. 6829; 1949, c. 1130, s. 3; 1957, c. 136, s. 11; 1963, c. 1018, s. 5; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; repealed by 2010-193, s. 13, effective December 1, 2010.

§ 127A-59.
Sentences.

When any sentence to fine or imprisonment is imposed by any military court of this State, it shall be the duty of the military judge, president of the court, or summary court officer, upon the approval of the court’s findings and sentence, to make out and sign a certificate entitling the case, giving the name of the accused, the date and place of trial, the date of approval of sentence, and the terms of the sentence. The trial counsel shall deliver the certificate to the Clerk of the Superior Court of Wake County, and it shall thereupon be the duty of the clerk to take the actions necessary to carry the sentence into execution in the same manner as prescribed by law for the collection of fines, or commitment to service of terms of imprisonment, in criminal cases determined in the courts of this State. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that the State’s criminal history records include pertinent information relating to a court-martial under this Chapter in a like manner as a comparable offense under the State’s criminal laws would be recorded.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 63; C.S., s. 6834; 1973, c. 108, s. 81; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2010-193, s. 14; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-193, s. 14, effective December 1, 2010, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, rewrote the section catchline, which formerly read: “Commitments”; and rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “the court’s findings and sentence” for “the findings and sentence of such court” in the first sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-60.
Approval of sentence.

No sentence imposed by a special or general court-martial of the North Carolina National Guard, not in the service of the United States, shall be executed until approved by the Governor. Any officer convicted by a general court-martial and dismissed from the service shall be forever disqualified from holding a commission in the militia.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 65; C.S., s. 6835; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 15; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-61.
Disposition of fines.

Fines imposed by courts-martial under this Chapter shall be disposed of as prescribed in Article IX, Sec. 7, of the Constitution of North Carolina.

History.

1975, c. 604, s. 2.

§ 127A-62.
Appeals; discretionary review.

Jurisdiction. — Court-martial judgments which include a sentence to confinement shall have a right of appeal to the Wake County Superior Court. The provisions of

G.S. 15A-1451

shall apply to appeals under this section.

Filing and Service. — An appeal under this section must be made in writing and filed with the Clerk of Superior Court of Wake County within 10 days after the approval of the sentence by the Governor. A copy of the petition shall be filed with the military court and the military trial counsel of record. For the purposes of a filing fee, the appeal shall be treated as an administrative appeal to the Superior Court.

Assertion of Errors. — All errors, including, but not limited to, the following, must be asserted or shall be deemed waived:

Any error of law, including the following:

The court erroneously failed to dismiss the charge prior to the court-martial.

The court’s ruling was contrary to law with regard to motions made before or during the trial or with regard to the admission or exclusion of evidence.

The evidence, at the close of all the evidence, was insufficient to justify submission of the case to the court-martial panel, whether or not a motion so asserting was made before verdict.

The court erroneously instructed the court-martial panel.

The verdict is contrary to the weight of the evidence.

For any other cause, the defendant did not receive a fair and impartial trial.

Appointment of Superior Court Judge. — The appeal shall be heard by a judge assigned by the Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court, to be heard at a session of the Wake County Superior Court designated by the Chief Justice.

Applicable Law. — The presiding judge, in determining whether there were errors, shall apply the law as provided for trial by courts-martial under this Article.

Setting Aside of Findings or Sentence. — The findings or sentence, or both, may be modified or set aside, in whole or in part, by the court on the ground of newly discovered evidence, fraud on the court, lack of jurisdiction over the accused or the offense, or error prejudicial to the substantial rights of the accused.

Hearings and Rehearings. — The court may remand the matter to the court-martial for evidentiary hearings or other proceedings, to be conducted by a military judge alone, that it deems necessary prior to the court’s final disposition of the case. If the court sets aside the findings or sentence, the court may, except when the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. If the court sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, the court shall dismiss the charges. If the court orders a rehearing, but the convening authority finds a rehearing impractical, the convening authority shall dismiss the charges.

Counsel. —

The Staff Judge Advocate of the North Carolina National Guard shall:

Designate a judge advocate who is qualified and certified under Article 27(b) of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and who is a member of the North Carolina Bar, to represent the defendant.

Designate a judge advocate who is qualified and certified under Article 27(b) of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and who is a member of the North Carolina Bar, to represent the State.

The counsel designated to represent the defendant under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be the counsel who represented the defendant at the court-martial.

Where a defendant alleges ineffective assistance of prior counsel as a ground for relief, the defendant shall be deemed to waive the attorney-client privilege with respect to both oral and written communications between the defendant and the prior counsel to the extent the defendant’s prior counsel reasonably believes the communications are necessary to defend against the allegations of ineffectiveness. This waiver of the attorney-client privilege shall be automatic upon the filing of the pleadings alleging ineffective assistance of prior counsel, and the Wake County Superior Court need not enter an order waiving the privilege.

The Adjutant General, upon the recommendation of the Staff Judge Advocate, shall place the designated judge advocates described in this subsection onto State active duty for the periods of time necessary for either counsel to provide adequate representation to the respective parties, if regularly scheduled unit training periods are insufficient. The Staff Judge Advocate shall verify to the Adjutant General whether any such additional periods of time are necessary.

Discretionary Review. — Review of decisions by the Wake County Superior Court shall be pursuant to

G.S. 7A-31.1

.

The rules for practice and procedure for review of courts-martial by the Wake County Superior Court shall be consistent with those prescribed for review of administrative appeals by the Superior Court, except as modified by this section.

History.

2010-193, s. 16; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

§ 127A-63.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 127A-64.
Availability of resources for National Guard Family Assistance Centers; report.

To the extent feasible and practicable, State and local agencies who provide services directed at individuals who have served in the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States and their families shall make personnel and other resources available to the National Guard Family Assistance Centers.

The Department of Public Safety shall report annually no later than September 1 to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety and to the House of Representatives Committee on Homeland Security, Military, and Veterans Affairs on the activities of the National Guard Family Assistance Centers during the previous fiscal year. This report shall include information on services provided as well as on the number and type of members of the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, veterans, and family members served.

The North Carolina National Guard may use funds appropriated to it for Family Assistance Centers for expenses related to support of surviving family members of deceased members of the North Carolina National Guard, including, but not limited to, the costs of providing educational materials; workshops; outreach events; and invitational travel, including per diem and other travel-related expenses.

History.

2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-185, s. 1; 2014-106, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 16B.9.

§ 127A-65.
List of rights; posting.

The North Carolina National Guard shall post on its Web site a list of the rights a servicemember or a dependent of a servicemember has under the North Carolina Servicemembers Civil Relief Act and under the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, Chapter 50 of Title 50 of the United States Code.

History.

2019-161, s. 1(c).

§ 127A-66.

Reserved for future codification purposes.